Utah statutes.
20A-6-102.   General requirements for machine counted ballots.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that ballots and ballot labels are printed:

(a)  to a size and arrangement that fits the construction of the voting device; and

(b)  in plain, clear type in black ink on clear white stock; or

(c)  in plain, clear type in black ink on stock of different colors if it is necessary to:

(i)  identify different ballots or parts of the ballot; or

(ii)  differentiate between political parties.

(2)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  ballot sheets are of a size, design, and stock suitable for processing by automatic data processing machines;

(b)  each ballot sheet has an attached perforated stub, on which is printed the words "Official Ballot, (initial) Poll Worker"; and

(c)  ballot stubs are numbered consecutively.

(3)  In elections in which voters are authorized to cast write-in votes, the election officer shall provide a separate write-in ballot, which may be in the form of a paper ballot, a card, or a secrecy envelope in which the voter places his ballot sheet after voting, to permit voters to write in the title of the office and the name of the person or persons for whom the voter wishes to cast a write-in vote.

(4)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the election officer may authorize any ballots that are to be counted by means of electronic or electromechanical devices to be printed to a size, layout, texture, and in any type of ink or combination of inks that will be suitable for use in the counting devices in which they are intended to be placed.



Amended by Chapter 326, 2006 General Session

